Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.12.060

Maintenance and operation.

The county auditor of a county in which voting systems are used is responsible for the preparation, maintenance, and operation of those systems and may employ and direct persons to perform some or all of these functions.

[ 2003 c 111 s 306. Prior: 1990 c 59 s 22; 1965 c 9 s 29.33.130; prior: 1955 c 323 s 2; prior: 1935 c 85 s 1, part; 1919 c 163 s 23, part; 1915 c 114 s 5, part; 1913 c 58 s 10, part; RRS s 5309, part. Formerly RCW 29.33.130.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.